Illinois, session 104th, SB1939.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Motor Vehicle Franchise Act is amended by 5changing Sections 2, 4, and 6 as follows: 6    (815 ILCS 710/2)  (from Ch. 121 1/2, par. 752)7    Sec. 2. Definitions. As used in this Act, the following 8words shall, unless the context otherwise requires, have the 9following meanings:10    (a) "Motor vehicle", any motor driven vehicle required to 11be registered under "The Illinois Vehicle Code". Beginning 12January 1, 2010, the term "motor vehicle" also includes any 13engine, transmission, or rear axle, regardless of whether it 14is attached to a vehicle chassis, that is manufactured for 15installation in any motor-driven vehicle with a gross vehicle 16weight rating of more than 16,000 pounds that is required to be 17registered under the Illinois Vehicle Code. 18    (b) "Manufacturer", any person engaged in the business of 19manufacturing or assembling new and unused motor vehicles. 20"Manufacturer" includes a factory branch, distributor, and 21distributor branch. 22    (c) "Factory branch", a branch office maintained by a 23manufacturer which manufactures or assembles motor vehicles   SB1939 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 12083 SPS 22180 b1for sale to distributors or motor vehicle dealers or which is 2maintained for directing and supervising the representatives 3of the manufacturer.4    (d) "Distributor branch", a branch office maintained by a 5distributor or wholesaler who or which sells or distributes 6new or used motor vehicles to motor vehicle dealers.7    (e) "Factory representative", a representative employed by 8a manufacturer or employed by a factory branch for the purpose 9of making or promoting the sale of motor vehicles or for 10contracting with, supervising, servicing or instructing motor 11vehicle dealers or prospective motor vehicle dealers.12    (f) "Distributor representative", a representative 13employed by a distributor branch, distributor or wholesaler.14    (g) "Distributor" or "wholesaler", any person who sells or 15distributes new or used motor vehicles to motor vehicle 16dealers or who maintains distributor representatives within 17the State.18    (h) "Motor vehicle dealer", any person who, in the 19ordinary course of business, is engaged in the business of 20selling new or used motor vehicles to consumers or other end 21users.22    (i) "Franchise", an oral or written arrangement for a 23definite or indefinite period in which a manufacturer, 24distributor or wholesaler grants to a motor vehicle dealer a 25license to use a trade name, service mark, or related 26characteristic, and in which there is a community of interest   SB1939 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 12083 SPS 22180 b1in the marketing of motor vehicles or services related thereto 2at wholesale, retail, leasing or otherwise.3    (j) "Franchiser", a manufacturer, distributor or 4wholesaler who grants a franchise to a motor vehicle dealer.5    (k) "Franchisee", a motor vehicle dealer to whom a 6franchise is offered or granted.7    (l) "Sale", shall include the issuance, transfer, 8agreement for transfer, exchange, pledge, hypothecation, 9mortgage in any form, whether by transfer in trust or 10otherwise, of any motor vehicle or interest therein or of any 11franchise related thereto; and any option, subscription or 12other contract or solicitation, looking to a sale, or offer or 13attempt to sell in any form, whether oral or written. A gift or 14delivery of any motor vehicle or franchise with respect 15thereto with or as a bonus on account of the sale of anything 16shall be deemed a sale of such motor vehicle or franchise.17    (m) "Fraud", shall include, in addition to its normal 18legal connotation, the following: a misrepresentation in any 19manner, whether intentionally false or due to reckless 20disregard for truth or falsity, of a material fact; a promise 21or representation not made honestly and in good faith; and an 22intentional failure to disclose a material fact.23    (n) "Person", a natural person, corporation, partnership, 24trust or other entity, and in case of an entity, it shall 25include any other entity in which it has a majority interest or 26which it effectively controls as well as the individual   SB1939 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 12083 SPS 22180 b1officers, directors and other persons in active control of the 2activities of each such entity.3    (o) "New motor vehicle", a motor vehicle which has not 4been previously sold to any person except a distributor or 5wholesaler or motor vehicle dealer for resale.6    (p) "Market Area", the franchisee's area of primary 7responsibility as defined in its franchise.8    (q) "Relevant Market Area", the area within a radius of 10 9miles from the principal location of a franchise or dealership 10if said principal location is in a county having a population 11of more than 300,000 persons; if the principal location of a 12franchise or dealership is in a county having a population of 13less than 300,000 persons, then "relevant market area" shall 14mean the area within a radius of 15 miles from the principal 15location of said franchise or dealership.16    (r) "Late model vehicle" means a vehicle of the current 17model year and one, 2, or 3 preceding model years for which the 18motor vehicle dealer holds an existing franchise from the 19manufacturer for that same line make.20    (s) "Factory repurchase vehicle" means a motor vehicle of 21the current model year or a late model vehicle reacquired by 22the manufacturer under an existing agreement or otherwise from 23a fleet, lease or daily rental company or under any State or 24federal law or program relating to allegedly defective new 25motor vehicles, and offered for sale and resold by the 26manufacturer directly or at a factory authorized or sponsored   SB1939 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 12083 SPS 22180 b1auction.2    (t) "Board" means the Motor Vehicle Review Board created 3under this Act.4    (u) "Secretary of State" means the Secretary of State of 5Illinois.6    (v) "Good cause" means facts establishing commercial 7reasonableness in lawful or privileged competition and 8business practices as defined at common law.9    (w) "Common entity" means any person who:10        (1) is directly or indirectly controlled by, or has 11    controlling equity interests owned, beneficially or of 12    record, through any form of ownership structure, by a 13    manufacturer, importer, distributor, or an affiliate 14    thereof; or15        (2) shares common management with a manufacturer, 16    importer, distributor, or an affiliate thereof, where the 17    relationships create operational control over the 18    management or policies of that person. 19    "Common entity" does not include:20        (1) any person engaged in the manufacturing, assembly, 21    sale, or distribution of motor vehicle parts, components, 22    accessories, or vehicle services, provided the person is 23    not engaged in the sale or distribution of new motor 24    vehicles; or25        (2) any financial institution chartered or authorized 26    to do business in this State, provided the financial   SB1939 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 12083 SPS 22180 b1    institution is not engaged in the sale or distribution of 2    new motor vehicles.3(Source: P.A. 100-308, eff. 8-24-17.) 4    (815 ILCS 710/4)  (from Ch. 121 1/2, par. 754)5    Sec. 4. Unfair competition and practices. 6    (a) The unfair methods of competition and unfair and 7deceptive acts or practices listed in this Section are hereby 8declared to be unlawful. In construing the provisions of this 9Section, the courts may be guided by the interpretations of 10the Federal Trade Commission Act (15 U.S.C. 45 et seq.), as 11from time to time amended.12    (b) It shall be deemed a violation for any manufacturer, 13factory branch, factory representative, distributor or 14wholesaler, distributor branch, distributor representative or 15motor vehicle dealer to engage in any action with respect to a 16franchise which is arbitrary, in bad faith or unconscionable 17and which causes damage to any of the parties or to the public, 18including directly or indirectly competing with their 19franchisees in the sale, lease, or warranty service of new 20motor vehicles.21    (c) It shall be deemed a violation for a manufacturer, a 22distributor, a wholesaler, a distributor branch or division, a 23factory branch or division, or a wholesale branch or division, 24or officer, agent or other representative thereof, to coerce, 25or attempt to coerce, any motor vehicle dealer:  SB1939 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 12083 SPS 22180 b1        (1) to accept, buy or order any motor vehicle or 2    vehicles, appliances, equipment, parts or accessories 3    therefor, or any other commodity or commodities or service 4    or services which such motor vehicle dealer has not 5    voluntarily ordered or requested except items required by 6    applicable local, state or federal law; or to require a 7    motor vehicle dealer to accept, buy, order or purchase 8    such items in order to obtain any motor vehicle or 9    vehicles or any other commodity or commodities which have 10    been ordered or requested by such motor vehicle dealer;11        (2) to order or accept delivery of any motor vehicle 12    with special features, appliances, accessories or 13    equipment not included in the list price of the motor 14    vehicles as publicly advertised by the manufacturer 15    thereof, except items required by applicable law; or16        (3) to order for anyone any parts, accessories, 17    equipment, machinery, tools, appliances or any commodity 18    whatsoever, except items required by applicable law.19    (c-5) A manufacturer, a distributor, a wholesaler, a 20distributor branch or division, a factory branch or division, 21or a wholesale branch or division, or officer, agent, or other 22representative thereof may not: 23        (1) require a motor vehicle dealer to offer a 24    secondary product; or25        (2) prohibit a motor vehicle dealer from offering a 26    secondary product, including, but not limited to:  SB1939 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 12083 SPS 22180 b1            (A) service contracts;2            (B) maintenance agreements;3            (C) extended warranties;4            (D) protection product guarantees;5            (E) guaranteed asset protection waivers;6            (F) insurance;7            (G) replacement parts;8            (H) vehicle accessories;9            (I) oil; or10            (J) supplies. 11    It is not a violation of this subsection to offer an 12incentive program to motor vehicle dealers to encourage them 13to sell or offer to sell a secondary product approved, 14endorsed, sponsored, or offered by the manufacturer, 15distributor, wholesaler, distributor branch or division, 16factory branch or division, wholesale branch or division, or 17officer, agent, or other representative thereof, provided the 18program does not provide vehicle sales or service incentives.19    It is not a violation of this subsection to prohibit a 20motor vehicle dealer from using secondary products for any 21repair work paid for under the terms of a warranty, recall, 22service contract, extended warranty, maintenance plan, or 23certified pre-owned vehicle program established or offered by 24the manufacturer, distributor, wholesaler, distributor branch 25or division, factory branch or division, or wholesale branch 26or division, or officer, agent, or other representative   SB1939 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 12083 SPS 22180 b1thereof.2    As used in this subsection, "secondary product" means all 3products that are not new motor vehicles or original equipment 4manufacturer parts. 5    (d) It shall be deemed a violation for a manufacturer, a 6distributor, a wholesaler, a distributor branch or division, 7or officer, agent or other representative thereof:8        (1) to adopt, change, establish or implement a plan or 9    system for the allocation and distribution of new motor 10    vehicles to motor vehicle dealers which is arbitrary or 11    capricious or to modify an existing plan so as to cause the 12    same to be arbitrary or capricious;13        (2) to fail or refuse to advise or disclose to any 14    motor vehicle dealer having a franchise or selling 15    agreement, upon written request therefor, the basis upon 16    which new motor vehicles of the same line make are 17    allocated or distributed to motor vehicle dealers in the 18    State and the basis upon which the current allocation or 19    distribution is being made or will be made to such motor 20    vehicle dealer;21        (3) to refuse to deliver in reasonable quantities and 22    within a reasonable time after receipt of dealer's order, 23    to any motor vehicle dealer having a franchise or selling 24    agreement for the retail sale of new motor vehicles sold 25    or distributed by such manufacturer, distributor, 26    wholesaler, distributor branch or division, factory branch   SB1939 Engrossed- 10 -LRB104 12083 SPS 22180 b1    or division or wholesale branch or division, any such 2    motor vehicles as are covered by such franchise or selling 3    agreement specifically publicly advertised in the State by 4    such manufacturer, distributor, wholesaler, distributor 5    branch or division, factory branch or division, or 6    wholesale branch or division to be available for immediate 7    delivery. However, the failure to deliver any motor 8    vehicle shall not be considered a violation of this Act if 9    such failure is due to an act of God, a work stoppage or 10    delay due to a strike or labor difficulty, a shortage of 11    materials, a lack of manufacturing capacity, a freight 12    embargo or other cause over which the manufacturer, 13    distributor, or wholesaler, or any agent thereof has no 14    control;15        (4) to coerce, or attempt to coerce, any motor vehicle 16    dealer to enter into any agreement with such manufacturer, 17    distributor, wholesaler, distributor branch or division, 18    factory branch or division, or wholesale branch or 19    division, or officer, agent or other representative 20    thereof, or to do any other act prejudicial to the dealer 21    by threatening to reduce his allocation of motor vehicles 22    or cancel any franchise or any selling agreement existing 23    between such manufacturer, distributor, wholesaler, 24    distributor branch or division, or factory branch or 25    division, or wholesale branch or division, and the dealer. 26    However, notice in good faith to any motor vehicle dealer   SB1939 Engrossed- 11 -LRB104 12083 SPS 22180 b1    of the dealer's violation of any terms or provisions of 2    such franchise or selling agreement or of any law or 3    regulation applicable to the conduct of a motor vehicle 4    dealer shall not constitute a violation of this Act;5        (5) to require a franchisee to participate in an 6    advertising campaign or contest or any promotional 7    campaign, or to purchase or lease any promotional 8    materials, training materials, show room or other display 9    decorations or materials at the expense of the franchisee;10        (6) to cancel or terminate the franchise or selling 11    agreement of a motor vehicle dealer without good cause and 12    without giving notice as hereinafter provided; to fail or 13    refuse to extend the franchise or selling agreement of a 14    motor vehicle dealer upon its expiration without good 15    cause and without giving notice as hereinafter provided; 16    or, to offer a renewal, replacement or succeeding 17    franchise or selling agreement containing terms and 18    provisions the effect of which is to substantially change 19    or modify the sales and service obligations or capital 20    requirements of the motor vehicle dealer arbitrarily and 21    without good cause and without giving notice as 22    hereinafter provided notwithstanding any term or provision 23    of a franchise or selling agreement.24            (A) If a manufacturer, distributor, wholesaler, 25        distributor branch or division, factory branch or 26        division or wholesale branch or division intends to   SB1939 Engrossed- 12 -LRB104 12083 SPS 22180 b1        cancel or terminate a franchise or selling agreement 2        or intends not to extend or renew a franchise or 3        selling agreement on its expiration, it shall send a 4        letter by certified mail, return receipt requested, to 5        the affected franchisee at least 60 days before the 6        effective date of the proposed action, or not later 7        than 10 days before the proposed action when the 8        reason for the action is based upon either of the 9        following:10                (i) the business operations of the franchisee 11            have been abandoned or the franchisee has failed 12            to conduct customary sales and service operations 13            during customary business hours for at least 7 14            consecutive business days unless such closing is 15            due to an act of God, strike or labor difficulty or 16            other cause over which the franchisee has no 17            control; or18                (ii) the conviction of or plea of nolo 19            contendere by the motor vehicle dealer or any 20            operator thereof in a court of competent 21            jurisdiction to an offense punishable by 22            imprisonment for more than two years.23            Each notice of proposed action shall include a 24        detailed statement setting forth the specific grounds 25        for the proposed cancellation, termination, or refusal 26        to extend or renew and shall state that the dealer has   SB1939 Engrossed- 13 -LRB104 12083 SPS 22180 b1        only 30 days from receipt of the notice to file with 2        the Motor Vehicle Review Board a written protest 3        against the proposed action.4            (B) If a manufacturer, distributor, wholesaler, 5        distributor branch or division, factory branch or 6        division or wholesale branch or division intends to 7        change substantially or modify the sales and service 8        obligations or capital requirements of a motor vehicle 9        dealer as a condition to extending or renewing the 10        existing franchise or selling agreement of such motor 11        vehicle dealer, it shall send a letter by certified 12        mail, return receipt requested, to the affected 13        franchisee at least 60 days before the date of 14        expiration of the franchise or selling agreement. Each 15        notice of proposed action shall include a detailed 16        statement setting forth the specific grounds for the 17        proposed action and shall state that the dealer has 18        only 30 days from receipt of the notice to file with 19        the Motor Vehicle Review Board a written protest 20        against the proposed action.21            (C) Within 30 days from receipt of the notice 22        under subparagraphs (A) and (B), the franchisee may 23        file with the Board a written protest against the 24        proposed action.25            When the protest has been timely filed, the Board 26        shall enter an order, fixing a date (within 60 days of   SB1939 Engrossed- 14 -LRB104 12083 SPS 22180 b1        the date of the order), time, and place of a hearing on 2        the protest required under Sections 12 and 29 of this 3        Act, and send by certified mail, return receipt 4        requested, a copy of the order to the manufacturer 5        that filed the notice of intention of the proposed 6        action and to the protesting dealer or franchisee.7            The manufacturer shall have the burden of proof to 8        establish that good cause exists to cancel or 9        terminate, or fail to extend or renew the franchise or 10        selling agreement of a motor vehicle dealer or 11        franchisee, and to change substantially or modify the 12        sales and service obligations or capital requirements 13        of a motor vehicle dealer as a condition to extending 14        or renewing the existing franchise or selling 15        agreement. The determination whether good cause exists 16        to cancel, terminate, or refuse to renew or extend the 17        franchise or selling agreement, or to change or modify 18        the obligations of the dealer as a condition to offer 19        renewal, replacement, or succession shall be made by 20        the Board under subsection (d) of Section 12 of this 21        Act.22            (D) Notwithstanding the terms, conditions, or 23        provisions of a franchise or selling agreement, the 24        following shall not constitute good cause for 25        cancelling or terminating or failing to extend or 26        renew the franchise or selling agreement: (i) the   SB1939 Engrossed- 15 -LRB104 12083 SPS 22180 b1        change of ownership or executive management of the 2        franchisee's dealership; or (ii) the fact that the 3        franchisee or owner of an interest in the franchise 4        owns, has an investment in, participates in the 5        management of, or holds a license for the sale of the 6        same or any other line make of new motor vehicles.7            (E) The manufacturer may not cancel or terminate, 8        or fail to extend or renew a franchise or selling 9        agreement or change or modify the obligations of the 10        franchisee as a condition to offering a renewal, 11        replacement, or succeeding franchise or selling 12        agreement before the hearing process is concluded as 13        prescribed by this Act, and thereafter, if the Board 14        determines that the manufacturer has failed to meet 15        its burden of proof and that good cause does not exist 16        to allow the proposed action;17        (7) notwithstanding the terms of any franchise 18    agreement, to fail to indemnify and hold harmless its 19    franchised dealers against any judgment or settlement for 20    damages, including, but not limited to, court costs, 21    expert witness fees, reasonable attorneys' fees of the new 22    motor vehicle dealer, and other expenses incurred in the 23    litigation, so long as such fees and costs are reasonable, 24    arising out of complaints, claims, or lawsuits, including, 25    but not limited to, strict liability, negligence, 26    misrepresentation, warranty (express or implied), or   SB1939 Engrossed- 16 -LRB104 12083 SPS 22180 b1    rescission of the sale as defined in Section 2-608 of the 2    Uniform Commercial Code, to the extent that the judgment 3    or settlement relates to the alleged defective or 4    negligent manufacture, assembly or design of new motor 5    vehicles, parts or accessories or other functions by the 6    manufacturer, beyond the control of the dealer; provided 7    that, in order to provide an adequate defense, the 8    manufacturer receives notice of the filing of a complaint, 9    claim, or lawsuit within 60 days after the filing;10        (8) to require or otherwise coerce a motor vehicle 11    dealer to underutilize the motor vehicle dealer's 12    facilities by requiring or otherwise coercing the motor 13    vehicle dealer to exclude or remove from the motor vehicle 14    dealer's facilities operations for selling or servicing of 15    any vehicles for which the motor vehicle dealer has a 16    franchise agreement with another manufacturer, 17    distributor, wholesaler, distribution branch or division, 18    or officer, agent, or other representative thereof; 19    provided, however, that, in light of all existing 20    circumstances, (i) the motor vehicle dealer maintains a 21    reasonable line of credit for each make or line of new 22    motor vehicle, (ii) the new motor vehicle dealer remains 23    in compliance with any reasonable facilities requirements 24    of the manufacturer, (iii) no change is made in the 25    principal management of the new motor vehicle dealer, and 26    (iv) the addition of the make or line of new motor vehicles   SB1939 Engrossed- 17 -LRB104 12083 SPS 22180 b1    would be reasonable. The reasonable facilities requirement 2    set forth in item (ii) of subsection (d)(8) shall not 3    include any requirement that a franchisee establish or 4    maintain exclusive facilities, personnel, or display 5    space. Any decision by a motor vehicle dealer to sell 6    additional makes or lines at the motor vehicle dealer's 7    facility shall be presumed to be reasonable, and the 8    manufacturer shall have the burden to overcome that 9    presumption. A motor vehicle dealer must provide a written 10    notification of its intent to add a make or line of new 11    motor vehicles to the manufacturer. If the manufacturer 12    does not respond to the motor vehicle dealer, in writing, 13    objecting to the addition of the make or line within 60 14    days after the date that the motor vehicle dealer sends 15    the written notification, then the manufacturer shall be 16    deemed to have approved the addition of the make or line; 17        (9) to use or consider the performance of a motor 18    vehicle dealer relating to the sale of the manufacturer's, 19    distributor's, or wholesaler's vehicles or the motor 20    vehicle dealer's ability to satisfy any minimum sales or 21    market share quota or responsibility relating to the sale 22    of the manufacturer's, distributor's, or wholesaler's new 23    vehicles in determining:24            (A) the motor vehicle dealer's eligibility to 25        purchase program, certified, or other used motor 26        vehicles from the manufacturer, distributor, or   SB1939 Engrossed- 18 -LRB104 12083 SPS 22180 b1        wholesaler;2            (B) the volume, type, or model of program, 3        certified, or other used motor vehicles that a motor 4        vehicle dealer is eligible to purchase from the 5        manufacturer, distributor, or wholesaler;6            (C) the price of any program, certified, or other 7        used motor vehicle that the dealer is eligible to 8        purchase from the manufacturer, distributor, or 9        wholesaler; or10            (D) the availability or amount of any discount, 11        credit, rebate, or sales incentive that the dealer is 12        eligible to receive from the manufacturer, 13        distributor, or wholesaler for the purchase of any 14        program, certified, or other used motor vehicle 15        offered for sale by the manufacturer, distributor, or 16        wholesaler;17        (10) to take any adverse action against a dealer 18    pursuant to an export or sale-for-resale prohibition 19    because the dealer sold or leased a vehicle to a customer 20    who either exported the vehicle to a foreign country or 21    resold the vehicle in violation of the prohibition, unless 22    the export or sale-for-resale prohibition policy was 23    provided to the dealer in writing either electronically or 24    on paper, prior to the sale or lease, and the dealer knew 25    or reasonably should have known of the customer's intent 26    to export or resell the vehicle in violation of the   SB1939 Engrossed- 19 -LRB104 12083 SPS 22180 b1    prohibition at the time of the sale or lease. If the dealer 2    causes the vehicle to be registered and titled in this or 3    any other state, and collects or causes to be collected 4    any applicable sales or use tax to this State, a 5    rebuttable presumption is established that the dealer did 6    not have reason to know of the customer's intent to resell 7    the vehicle;8        (11) to coerce or require any dealer to construct 9    improvements to his or her facilities or to install new 10    signs or other franchiser image elements that replace or 11    substantially alter those improvements, signs, or 12    franchiser image elements completed within the past 10 13    years that were required and approved by the manufacturer 14    or one of its affiliates. The 10-year period under this 15    paragraph (11) begins to run for a dealer, including that 16    dealer's successors and assigns, on the date that the 17    manufacturer gives final written approval of the facility 18    improvements or installation of signs or other franchiser 19    image elements or the date that the dealer receives a 20    certificate of occupancy, whichever is later. For the 21    purpose of this paragraph (11), the term "substantially 22    alter" does not include routine maintenance, including, 23    but not limited to, interior painting, that is reasonably 24    necessary to keep a dealer facility in attractive 25    condition; or 26        (12) to require a dealer to purchase goods or services   SB1939 Engrossed- 20 -LRB104 12083 SPS 22180 b1    to make improvements to the dealer's facilities from a 2    vendor selected, identified, or designated by a 3    manufacturer or one of its affiliates by agreement, 4    program, incentive provision, or otherwise without making 5    available to the dealer the option to obtain the goods or 6    services of substantially similar quality and overall 7    design from a vendor chosen by the dealer and approved by 8    the manufacturer; however, approval by the manufacturer 9    shall not be unreasonably withheld, and the dealer's 10    option to select a vendor shall not be available if the 11    manufacturer provides substantial reimbursement for the 12    goods or services offered. "Substantial reimbursement" 13    means an amount equal to or greater than the cost savings 14    that would result if the dealer were to utilize a vendor of 15    the dealer's own selection instead of using the vendor 16    identified by the manufacturer. For the purpose of this 17    paragraph (12), the term "goods" does not include movable 18    displays, brochures, and promotional materials containing 19    material subject to the intellectual property rights of a 20    manufacturer. If signs, other than signs containing the 21    manufacturer's brand or logo or free-standing signs that 22    are not directly attached to a building, or other 23    franchiser image or design elements or trade dress are to 24    be leased to the dealer by a vendor selected, identified, 25    or designated by the manufacturer, the dealer has the 26    right to purchase the signs or other franchiser image or   SB1939 Engrossed- 21 -LRB104 12083 SPS 22180 b1    design elements or trade dress of substantially similar 2    quality and design from a vendor selected by the dealer if 3    the signs, franchiser image or design elements, or trade 4    dress are approved by the manufacturer. Approval by the 5    manufacturer shall not be unreasonably withheld. This 6    paragraph (12) shall not be construed to allow a dealer or 7    vendor to impair, infringe upon, or eliminate, directly or 8    indirectly, the intellectual property rights of the 9    manufacturer, including, but not limited to, the 10    manufacturer's intellectual property rights in any 11    trademarks or trade dress, or other intellectual property 12    interests owned or controlled by the manufacturer. This 13    paragraph (12) shall not be construed to permit a dealer 14    to erect or maintain signs that do not conform to the 15    manufacturer's intellectual property rights or trademark 16    or trade dress usage guidelines. 17        (13) to establish or utilize any common entity, 18    affiliate, or spin-off company to sell, lease, or 19    otherwise distribute new motor vehicles directly to 20    consumers or to circumvent the manufacturer's new motor 21    vehicle distribution obligations under this Act, if the 22    manufacturer, including any common entities, subsidiaries, 23    or affiliates, currently or previously maintained a 24    franchise or selling agreement with a motor vehicle dealer 25    for the retail sale of motor vehicles in this State. 26    (e) It shall be deemed a violation for a manufacturer, a   SB1939 Engrossed- 22 -LRB104 12083 SPS 22180 b1distributor, a wholesaler, a distributor branch or division or 2officer, agent or other representative thereof:3        (1) to resort to or use any false or misleading 4    advertisement in connection with his business as such 5    manufacturer, distributor, wholesaler, distributor branch 6    or division or officer, agent or other representative 7    thereof;8        (2) to offer to sell or lease, or to sell or lease, any 9    new motor vehicle to any motor vehicle dealer at a lower 10    actual price therefor than the actual price offered to any 11    other motor vehicle dealer for the same model vehicle 12    similarly equipped or to utilize any device including, but 13    not limited to, sales promotion plans or programs which 14    result in such lesser actual price or fail to make 15    available to any motor vehicle dealer any preferential 16    pricing, incentive, rebate, finance rate, or low interest 17    loan program offered to competing motor vehicle dealers in 18    other contiguous states. However, the provisions of this 19    paragraph shall not apply to sales to a motor vehicle 20    dealer for resale to any unit of the United States 21    Government, the State or any of its political 22    subdivisions;23        (3) to offer to sell or lease, or to sell or lease, any 24    new motor vehicle to any person, except a wholesaler, 25    distributor or manufacturer's employees at a lower actual 26    price therefor than the actual price offered and charged   SB1939 Engrossed- 23 -LRB104 12083 SPS 22180 b1    to a motor vehicle dealer for the same model vehicle 2    similarly equipped or to utilize any device which results 3    in such lesser actual price. However, the provisions of 4    this paragraph shall not apply to sales to a motor vehicle 5    dealer for resale to any unit of the United States 6    Government, the State or any of its political 7    subdivisions;8        (4) to prevent or attempt to prevent by contract or 9    otherwise any motor vehicle dealer or franchisee from 10    changing the executive management control of the motor 11    vehicle dealer or franchisee unless the franchiser, having 12    the burden of proof, proves that such change of executive 13    management will result in executive management control by 14    a person or persons who are not of good moral character or 15    who do not meet the franchiser's existing and, with 16    consideration given to the volume of sales and service of 17    the dealership, uniformly applied minimum business 18    experience standards in the market area. However, where 19    the manufacturer rejects a proposed change in executive 20    management control, the manufacturer shall give written 21    notice of his reasons to the dealer within 60 days of 22    notice to the manufacturer by the dealer of the proposed 23    change. If the manufacturer does not send a letter to the 24    franchisee by certified mail, return receipt requested, 25    within 60 days from receipt by the manufacturer of the 26    proposed change, then the change of the executive   SB1939 Engrossed- 24 -LRB104 12083 SPS 22180 b1    management control of the franchisee shall be deemed 2    accepted as proposed by the franchisee, and the 3    manufacturer shall give immediate effect to such change;4        (5) to prevent or attempt to prevent by contract or 5    otherwise any motor vehicle dealer from establishing or 6    changing the capital structure of his dealership or the 7    means by or through which he finances the operation 8    thereof; provided the dealer meets any reasonable capital 9    standards agreed to between the dealer and the 10    manufacturer, distributor or wholesaler, who may require 11    that the sources, method and manner by which the dealer 12    finances or intends to finance its operation, equipment or 13    facilities be fully disclosed; 14        (6) to refuse to give effect to or prevent or attempt 15    to prevent by contract or otherwise any motor vehicle 16    dealer or any officer, partner or stockholder of any motor 17    vehicle dealer from selling or transferring any part of 18    the interest of any of them to any other person or persons 19    or party or parties unless such sale or transfer is to a 20    transferee who would not otherwise qualify for a new motor 21    vehicle dealers license under the Illinois Vehicle Code or 22    unless the franchiser, having the burden of proof, proves 23    that such sale or transfer is to a person or party who is 24    not of good moral character or does not meet the 25    franchiser's existing and reasonable capital standards 26    and, with consideration given to the volume of sales and   SB1939 Engrossed- 25 -LRB104 12083 SPS 22180 b1    service of the dealership, uniformly applied minimum 2    business experience standards in the market area. However, 3    nothing herein shall be construed to prevent a franchiser 4    from implementing affirmative action programs providing 5    business opportunities for minorities or from complying 6    with applicable federal, State or local law:7            (A) If the manufacturer intends to refuse to 8        approve the sale or transfer of all or a part of the 9        interest, then it shall, within 60 days from receipt 10        of the completed application forms generally utilized 11        by a manufacturer to conduct its review and a copy of 12        all agreements regarding the proposed transfer, send a 13        letter by certified mail, return receipt requested, 14        advising the franchisee of any refusal to approve the 15        sale or transfer of all or part of the interest and 16        shall state that the dealer only has 30 days from the 17        receipt of the notice to file with the Motor Vehicle 18        Review Board a written protest against the proposed 19        action. The notice shall set forth specific criteria 20        used to evaluate the prospective transferee and the 21        grounds for refusing to approve the sale or transfer 22        to that transferee. Within 30 days from the 23        franchisee's receipt of the manufacturer's notice, the 24        franchisee may file with the Board a written protest 25        against the proposed action.26            When a protest has been timely filed, the Board   SB1939 Engrossed- 26 -LRB104 12083 SPS 22180 b1        shall enter an order, fixing the date (within 60 days 2        of the date of such order), time, and place of a 3        hearing on the protest, required under Sections 12 and 4        29 of this Act, and send by certified mail, return 5        receipt requested, a copy of the order to the 6        manufacturer that filed notice of intention of the 7        proposed action and to the protesting franchisee.8            The manufacturer shall have the burden of proof to 9        establish that good cause exists to refuse to approve 10        the sale or transfer to the transferee. The 11        determination whether good cause exists to refuse to 12        approve the sale or transfer shall be made by the Board 13        under subdivisions (6)(B). The manufacturer shall not 14        refuse to approve the sale or transfer by a dealer or 15        an officer, partner, or stockholder of a franchise or 16        any part of the interest to any person or persons 17        before the hearing process is concluded as prescribed 18        by this Act, and thereafter if the Board determines 19        that the manufacturer has failed to meet its burden of 20        proof and that good cause does not exist to refuse to 21        approve the sale or transfer to the transferee.22            (B) Good cause to refuse to approve such sale or 23        transfer under this Section is established when such 24        sale or transfer is to a transferee who would not 25        otherwise qualify for a new motor vehicle dealers 26        license under the Illinois Vehicle Code or such sale   SB1939 Engrossed- 27 -LRB104 12083 SPS 22180 b1        or transfer is to a person or party who is not of good 2        moral character or does not meet the franchiser's 3        existing and reasonable capital standards and, with 4        consideration given to the volume of sales and service 5        of the dealership, uniformly applied minimum business 6        experience standards in the market area.7        (7) to obtain money, goods, services, anything of 8    value, or any other benefit from any other person with 9    whom the motor vehicle dealer does business, on account of 10    or in relation to the transactions between the dealer and 11    the other person as compensation, except for services 12    actually rendered, unless such benefit is promptly 13    accounted for and transmitted to the motor vehicle dealer;14        (8) to grant an additional franchise in the relevant 15    market area of an existing franchise of the same line make 16    or to relocate an existing motor vehicle dealership within 17    or into a relevant market area of an existing franchise of 18    the same line make. However, if the manufacturer wishes to 19    grant such an additional franchise to an independent 20    person in a bona fide relationship in which such person is 21    prepared to make a significant investment subject to loss 22    in such a dealership, or if the manufacturer wishes to 23    relocate an existing motor vehicle dealership, then the 24    manufacturer shall send a letter by certified mail, return 25    receipt requested, to each existing dealer or dealers of 26    the same line make whose relevant market area includes the   SB1939 Engrossed- 28 -LRB104 12083 SPS 22180 b1    proposed location of the additional or relocated franchise 2    at least 60 days before the manufacturer grants an 3    additional franchise or relocates an existing franchise of 4    the same line make within or into the relevant market area 5    of an existing franchisee of the same line make. Each 6    notice shall set forth the specific grounds for the 7    proposed grant of an additional or relocation of an 8    existing franchise and shall state that the dealer has 9    only 30 days from the date of receipt of the notice to file 10    with the Motor Vehicle Review Board a written protest 11    against the proposed action. Unless the parties agree upon 12    the grant or establishment of the additional or relocated 13    franchise within 30 days from the date the notice was 14    received by the existing franchisee of the same line make 15    or any person entitled to receive such notice, the 16    franchisee or other person may file with the Board a 17    written protest against the grant or establishment of the 18    proposed additional or relocated franchise.19        When a protest has been timely filed, the Board shall 20    enter an order fixing a date (within 60 days of the date of 21    the order), time, and place of a hearing on the protest, 22    required under Sections 12 and 29 of this Act, and send by 23    certified or registered mail, return receipt requested, a 24    copy of the order to the manufacturer that filed the 25    notice of intention to grant or establish the proposed 26    additional or relocated franchise and to the protesting   SB1939 Engrossed- 29 -LRB104 12083 SPS 22180 b1    dealer or dealers of the same line make whose relevant 2    market area includes the proposed location of the 3    additional or relocated franchise. 4        When more than one protest is filed against the grant 5    or establishment of the additional or relocated franchise 6    of the same line make, the Board may consolidate the 7    hearings to expedite disposition of the matter. The 8    manufacturer shall have the burden of proof to establish 9    that good cause exists to allow the grant or establishment 10    of the additional or relocated franchise. The manufacturer 11    may not grant or establish the additional franchise or 12    relocate the existing franchise before the hearing process 13    is concluded as prescribed by this Act, and thereafter if 14    the Board determines that the manufacturer has failed to 15    meet its burden of proof and that good cause does not exist 16    to allow the grant or establishment of the additional 17    franchise or relocation of the existing franchise.18        The determination whether good cause exists for 19    allowing the grant or establishment of an additional 20    franchise or relocated existing franchise, shall be made 21    by the Board under subsection (c) of Section 12 of this 22    Act. If the manufacturer seeks to enter into a contract, 23    agreement or other arrangement with any person, 24    establishing any additional motor vehicle dealership or 25    other facility, limited to the sale of factory repurchase 26    vehicles or late model vehicles, then the manufacturer   SB1939 Engrossed- 30 -LRB104 12083 SPS 22180 b1    shall follow the notice procedures set forth in this 2    Section and the determination whether good cause exists 3    for allowing the proposed agreement shall be made by the 4    Board under subsection (c) of Section 12, with the 5    manufacturer having the burden of proof.6            A. (Blank).7            B. For the purposes of this Section, appointment 8        of a successor motor vehicle dealer at the same 9        location as its predecessor, or within 2 miles of such 10        location, or the relocation of an existing dealer or 11        franchise within 2 miles of the relocating dealer's or 12        franchisee's existing location, shall not be construed 13        as a grant, establishment or the entering into of an 14        additional franchise or selling agreement, or a 15        relocation of an existing franchise. The reopening of 16        a motor vehicle dealership that has not been in 17        operation for 18 months or more shall be deemed the 18        grant of an additional franchise or selling agreement.19            C. This Section does not apply to the relocation 20        of an existing dealership or franchise in a county 21        having a population of more than 300,000 persons when 22        the new location is within the dealer's current 23        relevant market area, provided the new location is 24        more than 7 miles from the nearest dealer of the same 25        line make. This Section does not apply to the 26        relocation of an existing dealership or franchise in a   SB1939 Engrossed- 31 -LRB104 12083 SPS 22180 b1        county having a population of less than 300,000 2        persons when the new location is within the dealer's 3        current relevant market area, provided the new 4        location is more than 12 miles from the nearest dealer 5        of the same line make. A dealer that would be farther 6        away from the new location of an existing dealership 7        or franchise of the same line make after a relocation 8        may not file a written protest against the relocation 9        with the Motor Vehicle Review Board.10            D. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to 11        prevent a franchiser from implementing affirmative 12        action programs providing business opportunities for 13        minorities or from complying with applicable federal, 14        State or local law;15        (9) to require a motor vehicle dealer to assent to a 16    release, assignment, novation, waiver or estoppel which 17    would relieve any person from liability imposed by this 18    Act;19        (10) to prevent or refuse to give effect to the 20    succession to the ownership or management control of a 21    dealership by any legatee under the will of a dealer or to 22    an heir under the laws of descent and distribution of this 23    State unless the franchisee has designated a successor to 24    the ownership or management control under the succession 25    provisions of the franchise. Unless the franchiser, having 26    the burden of proof, proves that the successor is a person   SB1939 Engrossed- 32 -LRB104 12083 SPS 22180 b1    who is not of good moral character or does not meet the 2    franchiser's existing and reasonable capital standards 3    and, with consideration given to the volume of sales and 4    service of the dealership, uniformly applied minimum 5    business experience standards in the market area, any 6    designated successor of a dealer or franchisee may succeed 7    to the ownership or management control of a dealership 8    under the existing franchise if:9                (i) The designated successor gives the 10            franchiser written notice by certified mail, 11            return receipt requested, of his or her intention 12            to succeed to the ownership of the dealer within 13            60 days of the dealer's death or incapacity; and14                (ii) The designated successor agrees to be 15            bound by all the terms and conditions of the 16            existing franchise.17        Notwithstanding the foregoing, in the event the motor 18    vehicle dealer or franchisee and manufacturer have duly 19    executed an agreement concerning succession rights prior 20    to the dealer's death or incapacitation, the agreement 21    shall be observed.22            (A) If the franchiser intends to refuse to honor 23        the successor to the ownership of a deceased or 24        incapacitated dealer or franchisee under an existing 25        franchise agreement, the franchiser shall send a 26        letter by certified mail, return receipt requested, to   SB1939 Engrossed- 33 -LRB104 12083 SPS 22180 b1        the designated successor within 60 days from receipt 2        of a proposal advising of its intent to refuse to honor 3        the succession and to discontinue the existing 4        franchise agreement and shall state that the 5        designated successor only has 30 days from the receipt 6        of the notice to file with the Motor Vehicle Review 7        Board a written protest against the proposed action. 8        The notice shall set forth the specific grounds for 9        the refusal to honor the succession and discontinue 10        the existing franchise agreement.11            If notice of refusal is not timely served upon the 12        designated successor, the franchise agreement shall 13        continue in effect subject to termination only as 14        otherwise permitted by paragraph (6) of subsection (d) 15        of Section 4 of this Act.16            Within 30 days from the date the notice was 17        received by the designated successor or any other 18        person entitled to notice, the designee or other 19        person may file with the Board a written protest 20        against the proposed action.21            When a protest has been timely filed, the Board 22        shall enter an order, fixing a date (within 60 days of 23        the date of the order), time, and place of a hearing on 24        the protest, required under Sections 12 and 29 of this 25        Act, and send by certified mail, return receipt 26        requested, a copy of the order to the franchiser that   SB1939 Engrossed- 34 -LRB104 12083 SPS 22180 b1        filed the notice of intention of the proposed action 2        and to the protesting designee or such other person.3            The manufacturer shall have the burden of proof to 4        establish that good cause exists to refuse to honor 5        the succession and discontinue the existing franchise 6        agreement. The determination whether good cause exists 7        to refuse to honor the succession shall be made by the 8        Board under subdivision (B) of this paragraph (10). 9        The manufacturer shall not refuse to honor the 10        succession or discontinue the existing franchise 11        agreement before the hearing process is concluded as 12        prescribed by this Act, and thereafter if the Board 13        determines that it has failed to meet its burden of 14        proof and that good cause does not exist to refuse to 15        honor the succession and discontinue the existing 16        franchise agreement.17            (B) No manufacturer shall impose any conditions 18        upon honoring the succession and continuing the 19        existing franchise agreement with the designated 20        successor other than that the franchisee has 21        designated a successor to the ownership or management 22        control under the succession provisions of the 23        franchise, or that the designated successor is of good 24        moral character or meets the reasonable capital 25        standards and, with consideration given to the volume 26        of sales and service of the dealership, uniformly   SB1939 Engrossed- 35 -LRB104 12083 SPS 22180 b1        applied minimum business experience standards in the 2        market area;3        (11) to prevent or refuse to approve a proposal to 4    establish a successor franchise at a location previously 5    approved by the franchiser when submitted with the 6    voluntary termination by the existing franchisee unless 7    the successor franchisee would not otherwise qualify for a 8    new motor vehicle dealer's license under the Illinois 9    Vehicle Code or unless the franchiser, having the burden 10    of proof, proves that such proposed successor is not of 11    good moral character or does not meet the franchiser's 12    existing and reasonable capital standards and, with 13    consideration given to the volume of sales and service of 14    the dealership, uniformly applied minimum business 15    experience standards in the market area. However, when 16    such a rejection of a proposal is made, the manufacturer 17    shall give written notice of its reasons to the franchisee 18    within 60 days of receipt by the manufacturer of the 19    proposal. However, nothing herein shall be construed to 20    prevent a franchiser from implementing affirmative action 21    programs providing business opportunities for minorities, 22    or from complying with applicable federal, State or local 23    law;24        (12) to prevent or refuse to grant a franchise to a 25    person because such person owns, has investment in or 26    participates in the management of or holds a franchise for   SB1939 Engrossed- 36 -LRB104 12083 SPS 22180 b1    the sale of another make or line of motor vehicles within 7 2    miles of the proposed franchise location in a county 3    having a population of more than 300,000 persons, or 4    within 12 miles of the proposed franchise location in a 5    county having a population of less than 300,000 persons;6        (13) to prevent or attempt to prevent any new motor 7    vehicle dealer from establishing any additional motor 8    vehicle dealership or other facility limited to the sale 9    of factory repurchase vehicles or late model vehicles or 10    otherwise offering for sale factory repurchase vehicles of 11    the same line make at an existing franchise by failing to 12    make available any contract, agreement or other 13    arrangement which is made available or otherwise offered 14    to any person; or15        (14) to exercise a right of first refusal or other 16    right to acquire a franchise from a dealer, unless the 17    manufacturer:18            (A) notifies the dealer in writing that it intends 19        to exercise its right to acquire the franchise not 20        later than 60 days after the manufacturer's or 21        distributor's receipt of a notice of the proposed 22        transfer from the dealer and all information and 23        documents reasonably and customarily required by the 24        manufacturer or distributor supporting the proposed 25        transfer;26            (B) pays to the dealer the same or greater   SB1939 Engrossed- 37 -LRB104 12083 SPS 22180 b1        consideration as the dealer has contracted to receive 2        in connection with the proposed transfer or sale of 3        all or substantially all of the dealership assets, 4        stock, or other ownership interest, including the 5        purchase or lease of all real property, leasehold, or 6        improvements related to the transfer or sale of the 7        dealership. Upon exercise of the right of first 8        refusal or such other right, the manufacturer or 9        distributor shall have the right to assign the lease 10        or to convey the real property;11            (C) assumes all of the duties, obligations, and 12        liabilities contained in the agreements that were to 13        be assumed by the proposed transferee and with respect 14        to which the manufacturer or distributor exercised the 15        right of first refusal or other right to acquire the 16        franchise;17            (D) reimburses the proposed transferee for all 18        reasonable expenses incurred in evaluating, 19        investigating, and negotiating the transfer of the 20        dealership prior to the manufacturer's or 21        distributor's exercise of its right of first refusal 22        or other right to acquire the dealership. For purposes 23        of this paragraph, "reasonable expenses" includes the 24        usual and customary legal and accounting fees charged 25        for similar work, as well as expenses associated with 26        the evaluation and investigation of any real property   SB1939 Engrossed- 38 -LRB104 12083 SPS 22180 b1        on which the dealership is operated. The proposed 2        transferee shall submit an itemized list of its 3        expenses to the manufacturer or distributor not later 4        than 30 days after the manufacturer's or distributor's 5        exercise of the right of first refusal or other right 6        to acquire the motor vehicle franchise. The 7        manufacturer or distributor shall reimburse the 8        proposed transferee for its expenses not later than 90 9        days after receipt of the itemized list. A 10        manufacturer or distributor may request to be provided 11        with the itemized list of expenses before exercising 12        the manufacturer's or distributor's right of first 13        refusal.14        Except as provided in this paragraph (14), neither the 15    selling dealer nor the manufacturer or distributor shall 16    have any liability to any person as a result of a 17    manufacturer or distributor exercising its right of first 18    refusal. 19        For the purpose of this paragraph, "proposed 20    transferee" means the person to whom the franchise would 21    have been transferred to, or was proposed to be 22    transferred to, had the right of first refusal or other 23    right to acquire the franchise not been exercised by the 24    manufacturer or distributor. 25    (f) It is deemed a violation for a manufacturer, any 26parent company, subsidiary, affiliate, common entity, or agent   SB1939 Engrossed- 39 -LRB104 12083 SPS 22180 b1of the manufacturer, a distributor, a wholesaler, a 2distributor branch or division, a factory branch or division, 3or a wholesale branch or division, or officer, agent, broker, 4shareholder, except a shareholder of 1% or less of the 5outstanding shares of any class of securities of a 6manufacturer, distributor, or wholesaler which is a publicly 7traded corporation, or other representative, directly or 8indirectly, to own or operate a place of business as a motor 9vehicle franchisee or motor vehicle financing affiliate or to 10perform warranty service for retail consumers. , except that, 11this subsection shall not prohibit12    A manufacturer, common entity, or distributor, other than 13a manufacturer or distributor that was lawfully licensed to 14sell new motor vehicles directly to customers in this State 15before January 1, 2022, shall not own or operate a dealership 16or directly sell new vehicles in this State, nor shall such 17entities be eligible for a new motor vehicle dealer license 18under the Illinois Vehicle Code, regardless of the entity's 19branding as separate or independent of the controlling 20manufacturer.21    This subsection does not prohibit:22        (1) the ownership or operation of a place of business 23    by a manufacturer, distributor, or wholesaler for a 24    period, not to exceed 18 months, during the transition 25    from one motor vehicle franchisee to another; 26        (2) the investment in a motor vehicle franchisee by a   SB1939 Engrossed- 40 -LRB104 12083 SPS 22180 b1    manufacturer, distributor, or wholesaler if the investment 2    is for the sole purpose of enabling a partner or 3    shareholder in that motor vehicle franchisee to acquire an 4    interest in that motor vehicle franchisee and that partner 5    or shareholder is not otherwise employed by or associated 6    with the manufacturer, distributor, or wholesaler and 7    would not otherwise have the requisite capital investment 8    funds to invest in the motor vehicle franchisee, and has 9    the right to purchase the entire equity interest of the 10    manufacturer, distributor, or wholesaler in the motor 11    vehicle franchisee within a reasonable period of time not 12    to exceed 5 years; or13        (3) the ownership or operation of a place of business 14    by a manufacturer that manufactures only diesel engines 15    for installation in trucks having a gross vehicle weight 16    rating of more than 16,000 pounds that are required to be 17    registered under the Illinois Vehicle Code, provided that:18            (A) the manufacturer does not otherwise 19        manufacture, distribute, or sell motor vehicles as 20        defined under Section 1-217 of the Illinois Vehicle 21        Code;22            (B) the manufacturer owned a place of business and 23        it was in operation as of January 1, 2016;24            (C) the manufacturer complies with all obligations 25        owed to dealers that are not owned, operated, or 26        controlled by the manufacturer, including, but not   SB1939 Engrossed- 41 -LRB104 12083 SPS 22180 b1        limited to those obligations arising pursuant to 2        Section 6;3            (D) to further avoid any acts or practices, the 4        effect of which may be to lessen or eliminate 5        competition, the manufacturer provides to dealers on 6        substantially equal terms access to all support for 7        completing repairs, including, but not limited to, 8        parts and assemblies, training, and technical service 9        bulletins, and other information concerning repairs 10        that the manufacturer provides to facilities that are 11        owned, operated, or controlled by the manufacturer; 12        and13            (E) the manufacturer does not require that 14        warranty repair work be performed by a 15        manufacturer-owned repair facility and the 16        manufacturer provides any dealer that has an agreement 17        with the manufacturer to sell and perform warranty 18        repairs on the manufacturer's engines the opportunity 19        to perform warranty repairs on those engines, 20        regardless of whether the dealer sold the truck into 21        which the engine was installed. 22    (g) Notwithstanding the terms, provisions, or conditions 23of any agreement or waiver, it shall be deemed a violation for 24a manufacturer, a distributor, a wholesaler, a distributor 25branch or division, a factory branch or division, or a 26wholesale branch or division, or officer, agent, common   SB1939 Engrossed- 42 -LRB104 12083 SPS 22180 b1entity, or other representative thereof, to directly or 2indirectly condition the awarding of a franchise to a 3prospective new motor vehicle dealer, the addition of a line 4make or franchise to an existing dealer, the renewal of a 5franchise of an existing dealer, the approval of the 6relocation of an existing dealer's facility, or the approval 7of the sale or transfer of the ownership of a franchise on the 8willingness of a dealer, proposed new dealer, or owner of an 9interest in the dealership facility to enter into a site 10control agreement or exclusive use agreement unless separate 11and reasonable consideration was offered and accepted for that 12agreement.13    For purposes of this subsection (g), the terms "site 14control agreement" and "exclusive use agreement" include any 15agreement that has the effect of either (i) requiring that the 16dealer establish or maintain exclusive dealership facilities; 17or (ii) restricting the ability of the dealer, or the ability 18of the dealer's lessor in the event the dealership facility is 19being leased, to transfer, sell, lease, or change the use of 20the dealership premises, whether by sublease, lease, 21collateral pledge of lease, or other similar agreement. "Site 22control agreement" and "exclusive use agreement" also include 23a manufacturer restricting the ability of a dealer to 24transfer, sell, or lease the dealership premises by right of 25first refusal to purchase or lease, option to purchase, or 26option to lease if the transfer, sale, or lease of the   SB1939 Engrossed- 43 -LRB104 12083 SPS 22180 b1dealership premises is to a person who is an immediate family 2member of the dealer. For the purposes of this subsection (g), 3"immediate family member" means a spouse, parent, son, 4daughter, son-in-law, daughter-in-law, brother, and sister.5    If a manufacturer exercises any right of first refusal to 6purchase or lease or option to purchase or lease with regard to 7a transfer, sale, or lease of the dealership premises to a 8person who is not an immediate family member of the dealer, 9then (1) within 60 days from the receipt of the completed 10application forms generally utilized by a manufacturer to 11conduct its review and a copy of all agreements regarding the 12proposed transfer, the manufacturer must notify the dealer of 13its intent to exercise the right of first refusal to purchase 14or lease or option to purchase or lease and (2) the exercise of 15the right of first refusal to purchase or lease or option to 16purchase or lease must result in the dealer receiving 17consideration, terms, and conditions that either are the same 18as or greater than that which they have contracted to receive 19in connection with the proposed transfer, sale, or lease of 20the dealership premises. 21    Any provision contained in any agreement entered into on 22or after November 25, 2009 (the effective date of Public Act 2396-824) that is inconsistent with the provisions of this 24subsection (g) shall be voidable at the election of the 25affected dealer, prospective dealer, or owner of an interest 26in the dealership facility.   SB1939 Engrossed- 44 -LRB104 12083 SPS 22180 b1    (h) For purposes of this subsection:2    "Successor manufacturer" means any motor vehicle 3manufacturer that, on or after January 1, 2009, acquires, 4succeeds to, or assumes any part of the business of another 5manufacturer, referred to as the "predecessor manufacturer", 6as the result of any of the following:7        (i) A change in ownership, operation, or control of 8    the predecessor manufacturer by sale or transfer of 9    assets, corporate stock or other equity interest, 10    assignment, merger, consolidation, combination, joint 11    venture, redemption, court-approved sale, operation of law 12    or otherwise. 13        (ii) The termination, suspension, or cessation of a 14    part or all of the business operations of the predecessor 15    manufacturer.16        (iii) The discontinuance of the sale of the product 17    line.18        (iv) A change in distribution system by the 19    predecessor manufacturer, whether through a change in 20    distributor or the predecessor manufacturer's decision to 21    cease conducting business through a distributor 22    altogether. 23    "Former Franchisee" means a new motor vehicle dealer that 24has entered into a franchise with a predecessor manufacturer 25and that has either:26        (i) entered into a termination agreement or deferred   SB1939 Engrossed- 45 -LRB104 12083 SPS 22180 b1    termination agreement with a predecessor or successor 2    manufacturer related to such franchise; or3        (ii) has had such franchise canceled, terminated, 4    nonrenewed, noncontinued, rejected, nonassumed, or 5    otherwise ended. 6    For a period of 3 years from: (i) the date that a successor 7manufacturer acquires, succeeds to, or assumes any part of the 8business of a predecessor manufacturer; (ii) the last day that 9a former franchisee is authorized to remain in business as a 10franchised dealer with respect to a particular franchise under 11a termination agreement or deferred termination agreement with 12a predecessor or successor manufacturer; (iii) the last day 13that a former franchisee that was cancelled, terminated, 14nonrenewed, noncontinued, rejected, nonassumed, or otherwise 15ended by a predecessor or successor manufacturer is authorized 16to remain in business as a franchised dealer with respect to a 17particular franchise; or (iv) November 25, 2009 (the effective 18date of Public Act 96-824), whichever is latest, it shall be 19unlawful for such successor manufacturer to enter into a same 20line make franchise with any person or to permit the 21relocation of any existing same line make franchise, for a 22line make of the predecessor manufacturer that would be 23located or relocated within the relevant market area of a 24former franchisee who owned or leased a dealership facility in 25that relevant market area without first offering the 26additional or relocated franchise to the former franchisee, or   SB1939 Engrossed- 46 -LRB104 12083 SPS 22180 b1the designated successor of such former franchisee in the 2event the former franchisee is deceased or a person with a 3disability, at no cost and without any requirements or 4restrictions other than those imposed generally on the 5manufacturer's other franchisees at that time, unless one of 6the following applies: 7        (1) As a result of the former franchisee's 8    cancellation, termination, noncontinuance, or nonrenewal 9    of the franchise, the predecessor manufacturer had 10    consolidated the line make with another of its line makes 11    for which the predecessor manufacturer had a franchisee 12    with a then-existing dealership facility located within 13    that relevant market area.14        (2) The successor manufacturer has paid the former 15    franchisee, or the designated successor of such former 16    franchisee in the event the former franchisee is deceased 17    or a person with a disability, the fair market value of the 18    former franchisee's franchise on (i) the date the 19    franchiser announces the action which results in the 20    termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal; or (ii) the date 21    the action which results in termination, cancellation, or 22    nonrenewal first became general knowledge; or (iii) the 23    day 12 months prior to the date on which the notice of 24    termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal is issued, 25    whichever amount is higher. Payment is due within 90 days 26    of the effective date of the termination, cancellation, or   SB1939 Engrossed- 47 -LRB104 12083 SPS 22180 b1    nonrenewal. If the termination, cancellation, or 2    nonrenewal is due to a manufacturer's change in 3    distributors, the manufacturer may avoid paying fair 4    market value to the dealer if the new distributor or the 5    manufacturer offers the dealer a franchise agreement with 6    terms acceptable to the dealer.7        (3) The successor manufacturer proves that it would 8    have had good cause to terminate the franchise agreement 9    of the former franchisee, or the successor of the former 10    franchisee under item (e)(10) in the event that the former 11    franchisee is deceased or a person with a disability. The 12    determination of whether the successor manufacturer would 13    have had good cause to terminate the franchise agreement 14    of the former franchisee, or the successor of the former 15    franchisee, shall be made by the Board under subsection 16    (d) of Section 12. A successor manufacturer that seeks to 17    assert that it would have had good cause to terminate a 18    former franchisee, or the successor of the former 19    franchisee, must file a petition seeking a hearing on this 20    issue before the Board and shall have the burden of 21    proving that it would have had good cause to terminate the 22    former franchisee or the successor of the former 23    franchisee. No successor dealer, other than the former 24    franchisee, may be appointed or franchised by the 25    successor manufacturer within the relevant market area of 26    the former franchisee until the Board has held a hearing   SB1939 Engrossed- 48 -LRB104 12083 SPS 22180 b1    and rendered a determination on the issue of whether the 2    successor manufacturer would have had good cause to 3    terminate the former franchisee. 4    In the event that a successor manufacturer attempts to 5enter into a same line make franchise with any person or to 6permit the relocation of any existing line make franchise 7under this subsection (h) at a location that is within the 8relevant market area of 2 or more former franchisees, then the 9successor manufacturer may not offer it to any person other 10than one of those former franchisees unless the successor 11manufacturer can prove that at least one of the 3 exceptions in 12items (1), (2), and (3) of this subsection (h) applies to each 13of those former franchisees. 14    (i) It shall be deemed a violation of this Section for any 15manufacturer with an established franchise dealer network in 16this State, either directly or indirectly, through any parent, 17subsidiary, affiliate, or agent of the manufacturer, any 18person under common ownership or control, or common entity, to 19engage in the sale, lease, or warranty servicing of new motor 20vehicles in a manner that bypasses or competes with the 21manufacturer's existing franchisee network, including, but not 22limited to:23        (1) engaging in practices intended to circumvent, 24    evade, or undermine the rights, obligations, or 25    protections afforded to franchisees under this Act; or26        (2) establishing or using newly branded entities,   SB1939 Engrossed- 49 -LRB104 12083 SPS 22180 b1    spin-offs, or affiliated or subsidiary entities to conduct 2    retail operations outside the franchise system.3    (j) A manufacturer or distributor shall not engage in the 4sale of new motor vehicles directly to the general public in 5this State unless the manufacturer or distributor was lawfully 6licensed to sell new motor vehicles directly to consumers in 7this State before January 1, 2022.8(Source: P.A. 102-433, eff. 1-1-22.) 9    (815 ILCS 710/6)  (from Ch. 121 1/2, par. 756)10    Sec. 6. Warranty agreements; claims; approval; payment; 11written disapproval.12    (a) Every manufacturer, distributor, wholesaler, 13distributor branch or division, factory branch or division, or 14wholesale branch or division shall properly fulfill any 15warranty agreement and adequately and fairly compensate each 16of its motor vehicle dealers for labor and parts.17    (b) Adequate and fair compensation requires the 18manufacturer to pay each dealer no less than the amount the 19retail customer pays for the same services with regard to rate 20and time.21    Any time guide previously agreed to by the manufacturer 22and the dealer for extended warranty repairs may be used in 23lieu of actual time expended. In the event that a time guide 24has not been agreed to for warranty repairs, or said time guide 25does not define time for an applicable warranty repair, the   SB1939 Engrossed- 50 -LRB104 12083 SPS 22180 b1manufacturer's time guide shall be used, multiplied by 1.5. 2    In no event shall such compensation fail to include full 3compensation for diagnostic work, as well as repair service, 4labor, and parts. Time allowances for the diagnosis and 5performance of warranty work and service shall be no less than 6charged to retail customers for the same work to be performed.7    No warranty or factory compensated repairs shall be 8excluded from this requirement, including recalls or other 9voluntary stop-sell repairs required by the manufacturer. If a 10manufacturer is required to issue a recall, the dealer will be 11compensated for labor time as above stated.12    Furthermore, manufacturers shall pay the dealer the same 13effective labor rate (using the 100 sequential repair orders 14chosen and submitted by the dealer less simple maintenance 15repair orders) that the dealer receives for customer-pay 16repairs. This requirement includes vehicle diagnostic times 17for all warranty repairs. Additionally, if a technician is 18required to communicate with a Technical Assistance 19Center/Engineering/or some external manufacturer source in 20order to provide a warranty repair, the manufacturer shall pay 21for the time from start of communications (including hold 22time) until the communication is complete.23    The dealer may submit a request to the manufacturer for 24warranty labor rate increases a maximum of once per calendar 25year.26    A claim made by a franchised motor vehicle dealer for   SB1939 Engrossed- 51 -LRB104 12083 SPS 22180 b1compensation under this Section shall be either approved or 2disapproved within 30 days after the claim is submitted to the 3manufacturer in the manner and on the forms the manufacturer 4reasonably prescribes. An approved claim shall be paid within 530 days after its approval. If a claim is not specifically 6disapproved in writing or by electronic transmission within 30 7days after the date on which the manufacturer receives it, the 8claim shall be considered to be approved and payment shall 9follow within 30 days. 10    In no event shall compensation to a motor vehicle dealer 11for labor times and labor rates be less than the rates charged 12by such dealer for like service to retail customers for 13nonwarranty service and repairs. Additionally, the 14manufacturer shall reimburse the dealer for any parts provided 15in satisfaction of a warranty at the prevailing retail price 16charged by that dealer for the same parts when not provided in 17satisfaction of a warranty; provided that such dealer's 18prevailing retail price is not unreasonable when compared with 19that of the holders of motor vehicle franchises of from the 20same line make manufacturer for identical parts in the 21geographic area in which the dealer is engaged in business.22    There shall be no reduction in payments due to 23preestablished market norms or market averages. Manufacturers 24are prohibited from establishing restrictions or limitations 25of customer repair frequency due to failure rate indexes or 26national failure averages.  SB1939 Engrossed- 52 -LRB104 12083 SPS 22180 b1    No debit reduction or charge back of any item on a warranty 2repair order may be made absent a finding of fraud or illegal 3actions by the dealer.4    A warranty claim timely made shall not be deemed invalid 5solely because unavailable parts cause additional use and 6mileage on the vehicle.7    If a manufacturer imposes a recall or stop sale on any new 8vehicle in a dealer's inventory that prevents the sale of the 9vehicle, the manufacturer shall compensate the dealer for any 10interest and storage until the vehicle is repaired and made 11ready for sale.12    Manufacturers are not permitted to impose any form of cost 13recovery fees or surcharges against a franchised auto 14dealership for payments made in accordance with this Section. 15    All claims, either original or resubmitted, made by motor 16vehicle dealers hereunder and under Section 5 for such labor 17and parts shall be either approved or disapproved within 30 18days following their submission. All approved claims shall be 19paid within 30 days following their approval. The motor 20vehicle dealer who submits a claim which is disapproved shall 21be notified in writing of the disapproval within the same 22period, and each such notice shall state the specific grounds 23upon which the disapproval is based. The motor vehicle dealer 24shall be permitted to correct and resubmit such disapproved 25claims within 30 days of receipt of disapproval. Any claims 26not specifically disapproved in writing within 30 days from   SB1939 Engrossed- 53 -LRB104 12083 SPS 22180 b1their submission shall be deemed approved and payment shall 2follow within 30 days. The manufacturer or franchiser shall 3have the right to require reasonable documentation for claims 4and to audit such claims within a one year period from the date 5the claim was paid or credit issued by the manufacturer or 6franchiser, and to charge back any false or unsubstantiated 7claims. The audit and charge back provisions of this Section 8also apply to all other incentive and reimbursement programs 9for a period of one year after the date the claim was paid or 10credit issued by the manufacturer or franchiser. However, the 11manufacturer retains the right to charge back any fraudulent 12claim if the manufacturer establishes in a court of competent 13jurisdiction in this State that the claim is fraudulent.14    (c) The motor vehicle franchiser shall not, by agreement, 15by restrictions upon reimbursement, or otherwise, restrict the 16nature and extent of services to be rendered or parts to be 17provided so that such restriction prevents the motor vehicle 18franchisee from satisfying the warranty by rendering services 19in a good and workmanlike manner and providing parts which are 20required in accordance with generally accepted standards. Any 21such restriction shall constitute a prohibited practice.22    (d) For the purposes of this Section, the "prevailing 23retail price charged by that dealer for the same parts" means 24the price paid by the motor vehicle franchisee for parts, 25including all shipping and other charges, multiplied by the 26sum of 1.0 and the franchisee's average percentage markup over   SB1939 Engrossed- 54 -LRB104 12083 SPS 22180 b1the price paid by the motor vehicle franchisee for parts 2purchased by the motor vehicle franchisee from the motor 3vehicle franchiser and sold at retail. The motor vehicle 4franchisee may establish average percentage markup under this 5Section by submitting to the motor vehicle franchiser 100 6sequential customer paid service repair orders or 90 days of 7customer paid service repair orders, whichever is less, 8covering repairs made no more than 180 days before the 9submission, and declaring what the average percentage markup 10is. The average percentage markup so declared shall go into 11effect 30 days following the declaration, subject to audit of 12the submitted repair orders by the motor vehicle franchiser 13and adjustment of the average percentage markup based on that 14audit. Any audit must be conducted within 30 days following 15the declaration. Only retail sales not involving warranty 16repairs, parts covered by subsection (e) of this Section, or 17parts supplied for routine vehicle maintenance, shall be 18considered in calculating average percentage markup. For the 19purpose of this subsection, "routine maintenance" includes, 20but is not limited to: (i) the replacement of oil or other 21fluids, filters, batteries for internal combustion engine 22vehicles, bulbs, brake pads, rotors, nuts, bolts, or 23fasteners; (ii) the replacement of or work on tires or wheels, 24including wheel alignments and tire and wheel rotations; and 25(iii) the installation of an accessory. No motor vehicle 26franchiser shall require a motor vehicle franchisee to   SB1939 Engrossed- 55 -LRB104 12083 SPS 22180 b1establish average percentage markup by a methodology, or by 2requiring information, that is unduly burdensome or time 3consuming to provide, including, but not limited to, part by 4part or transaction by transaction calculations. A motor 5vehicle franchisee shall not request a change in the average 6percentage markup more than twice in one calendar year.7    (e) If a motor vehicle franchiser supplies a part or parts 8for use in a repair rendered under a warranty other than by 9sale of that part or parts to the motor vehicle franchisee, the 10motor vehicle franchisee shall be entitled to compensation 11equivalent to the motor vehicle franchisee's average 12percentage markup on the part or parts, as if the part or parts 13had been sold to the motor vehicle franchisee by the motor 14vehicle franchiser. The requirements of this subsection (e) 15shall not apply to entire engine assemblies, propulsion engine 16assemblies, including electric vehicle batteries, and entire 17transmission assemblies. In the case of those assemblies, the 18motor vehicle franchiser shall reimburse the motor vehicle 19franchisee up to and including 30% of what the motor vehicle 20franchisee would have paid the motor vehicle franchiser for 21the assembly if the assembly had not been supplied by the 22franchiser other than by the sale of that assembly to the motor 23vehicle franchisee. 24    (f) The obligations imposed on motor vehicle franchisers 25by this Section shall apply to any parent, subsidiary, 26affiliate, or agent of the motor vehicle franchiser, any   SB1939 Engrossed- 56 -LRB104 12083 SPS 22180 b1person under common ownership or control, any employee of the 2motor vehicle franchiser, and any person holding 1% or more of 3the shares of any class of securities or other ownership 4interest in the motor vehicle franchiser, if a warranty or 5service or repair plan is issued by that person instead of or 6in addition to one issued by the motor vehicle franchiser.7    (g) (Blank).8(Source: P.A. 102-232, eff. 1-1-22; 102-669, eff. 11-16-21.)